Vermont, session 2025-2026, H320.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. GREEN MOUNTAIN CARE BOARD; HOSPITAL
TRANSFORMATION; MORATORIUM; REPORT
(a)(1) The Green Mountain Care Board shall not implement or pursue
implementation of any of the following recommendations from the
consultant’s report prepared for the Board pursuant to 2022 Acts and Resolves
No. 167, Sec. 2, prior to July 1, 2026:
(A) permit no further increases in commercial subsidization for
hospital financial shortfalls;
(B) refrain from licensing any further hospital-based outpatient
department units;
VT LEG #380380 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.320
2025 Page 3 of 5
(C) begin movement to reference-based pricing, ideally at 200
percent of Medicare or less for prospective payment system (PPS) hospitals;
and
(D) require all hospitals to use the same accounting agency and
method to construct hospital financials and budget submissions.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board shall promptly pursue
implementation of the following recommendations from the same consultant’s
report:
(A) simplify and shorten the certificate of need process; and
(B) encourage freestanding diagnostic, ambulatory surgical, and birth
centers.
(b) The members and staff of the Green Mountain Care Board shall collect
financial and service-level data directly from Vermont hospitals in order to
establish appropriate goals and methodologies for hospital system
transformation that will stabilize small, rural hospitals and preserve access to
hospital services in communities across the State. The Board shall report these
goals and methodologies to the General Assembly on or before March 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EXPANDED OPTIONS IN HEALTH INSURANCE MARKET;
REPORT
(a) The Department of Vermont Health Access, in collaboration with the
Department of Financial Regulation, shall explore opportunities to expand the
VT LEG #380380 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.320
2025 Page 4 of 5
number of health insurers that offer qualified health plans to individuals and
small groups on the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange beyond the two health
insurers currently participating.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Department of Vermont Health
Access and the Department of Financial Regulation shall report to the House
Committee on Health Care and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare
and on Finance its findings and recommendations for expanding the number of
health insurers offering qualified health plans in Vermont.
Sec. 3. AREA HEALTH EDUCATION CENTERS; MEDICAL
EDUCATION; RURAL HOSPITALS; REPORT
(a) The Area Health Education Centers program (AHEC) shall develop a
plan for placing medical students, residents, and fellows in clinical rotations at
critical access hospitals in Vermont in order to increase the supply of new
physicians interested in pursuing employment in rural hospital settings. AHEC
shall consider opportunities to use new or existing State scholarship and loan
repayment programs to encourage careers in rural medicine.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, AHEC shall provide its plan and its
recommendations for using State programs to increase Vermont’s rural
medicine workforce.
Sec. 4. HOSPITAL PATIENTS AWAITING TRANSFER;
UNCOMPENSATED CARE; REPORT
VT LEG #380380 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.320
2025 Page 5 of 5
The Green Mountain Care Board, in collaboration with the Departments of
Vermont Health Access and of Financial Regulation and in consultation with
representatives of Vermont hospitals, health insurers, and the Office of the
Health Care Advocate, shall develop recommendations for compensating
hospitals for the costs of maintaining patients who are awaiting transfer to
another hospital or other health care facility when the patient must remain at
the sending hospital for more than 24 hours and the hospital is not otherwise
being reimbursed for the care. On or before December 1, 2025, the Board shall
provide its recommendations to the House Committee on Health Care and the
Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on Finance.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380380 v.1